Hawaii statutes.
§438-13 Penalties. Any person who
practices barbering, operates a barber shop, or acts in any capacity wherein a
license, apprentice permit, or temporary permit is required, without a license,
apprentice permit, or temporary permit as provided in this chapter shall be
fined not more than $100, or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.
Each day of violation shall be a separate offense. [L 1947, c 194, §15; RL
1955, §58-13; am L 1961, c 184, §6(b); HRS §438-13; am L 1987, c 246, §10; am L
1993, c 264, §10]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next